Utah statutes.
48-2c-407.   Authority to amend articles of organization.

(1) (a)  A company may amend its articles of organization at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles of organization or to delete a provision not required in the articles of organization.

(b)  Whether a provision is required or permitted in the articles of organization is determined as of the effective date of the amendment.

(2)  Except as may otherwise be expressly provided in the articles of organization or operating agreement, a member has no vested property right resulting from any provision in the articles of organization, including any provision relating to management, control, capital structure, purpose, duration of the company, or entitlement to distributions.

